District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.42

First Source Agreement required.

HQ Hotel, L.L.C., shall enter into a First Source Agreement with the District that shall govern certain obligations of HQ Hotel, L.L.C., pursuant to § 2-219.03 and Mayor’s Order 83-265 (November 9, 1983), regarding job creation and employment generated as a result of the construction of the new convention center hotel.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 902
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-78,§ 2(i), 56 DCR 6959
redesignated as § 242, Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 73(b)(3), 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated D.C. Law 10-188, § 902 as D.C. Law 10-188, § 242.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(i) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-186, August 12, 2009, 56 DCR 6967).